Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.420

Private road or driveway.

"Private road or driveway" includes every way or place in private ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.420. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 45; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]